ja: ヘルメットのフィット感（頭のShapes）: インターミディエイトオーバル; ロングオーバル; ラウンドオーバル; その他
sk-SK: Tvar prilby (tvar hlavy): Stredný ovál; Dlhý ovál; Okrúhly ovál; Iné
pt-BR: Ajuste do capacete (forma da cabeça): Oval intermediário; Oval longo; Oval redondo; Outro
ko: 헬멧 착용감(머리 Shapes): 중간 타원형; 긴 타원형; 둥근 타원형; 기타
th: ความกระชับของหมวกกันน็อค (รูปทรงศีรษะ): รูปไข่กลาง; รูปไข่ยาว; รูปไข่กลม; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Prilagođenost kacige (oblik glave): Srednje ovalni; Dugo ovalni; Okruglo ovalni; Ostalo
lt-LT: Šalmo pritaikymas (galvos forma): Vidutinio ovalumo; Ilgo ovalumo; Apvalaus ovalumo; Kita
ro-RO: Compatibilitatea căștii cu forma capului (forma capului): Oval intermediar; Oval alungit; Oval rotund; Altele
nl: Helm pasvorm (hoofdvorm): Intermediair ovaal; Lang ovaal; Rond ovaal; Overig
de: Helmpassform (Kopfform): Mittleres Oval; Langes Oval; Rundes Oval; Sonstige
hu: Sisak illeszkedése ( fejforma): Köztes ovális; Hosszú ovális; Kerek ovális; Egyéb
es: Calce del casco (forma de la cabeza): Ovalado intermedio; Ovalado largo; Ovalado redondo; Otro
cs: Typ helmy (tvar hlavy): Středně oválný; Dlouze oválný; Kulatě oválný; Jiný
bg-BG: Прилягане на каската (форма на главата): Междинен овал; Дълъг овал; Кръгъл овал; Други
sv: Passform för hjälm (huvudform): Mellanoval; Lång oval; Rund oval; Övrigt
zh-TW: 頭盔貼合度 (頭型): 中等橢圓形; 長橢圓形; 圓橢圓形; 其他
nb: Hjelmtilpasning (hodeform): Mellomoval; Lang oval; Rund oval; Annet
el: Εφαρμογή κράνους (σχήμα κεφαλής): Ενδιάμεσο οβάλ; Μακρύ οβάλ; Στρογγυλό οβάλ; Άλλο
en: Helmet fit (head shape): Intermediate oval; Long oval; Round oval; Other
ru: Посадка шлема (форма головы): Промежуточный овал; Длинный овал; Круглый овал; Другое
zh-CN: 头盔贴合度（头型适配）: 中等椭圆; 长椭圆; 圆椭圆; 其他
fr: Ajustement du casque (forme de la tête): Ovale intermédiaire; Ovale long; Ovale rond; Autre
pt-PT: Ajuste do capacete (forma da cabeça): Oval intermédio; Oval longo; Oval redondo; Outro
sl-SI: Prileganje čelade (oblika glave): Srednje ovalna; Dolgo ovalna; Okroglo ovalna; Drugo
tr: Kask uyumu (baş şekli): Orta oval; Uzun oval; Yuvarlak oval; Diğer
fi: Kypärän istuvuus (pään muoto): Keskipitkä soikea; Pitkä soikea; Pyöreä soikea; Muu
da: Hjelmens pasform (hovedform): Mellemoval; Lang oval; Rund oval; Andet
it: Vestibilità del casco (forma della testa): Ovale intermedio; Ovale lungo; Ovale rotondo; Altro
pl: Dopasowanie kasku (kształt głowy): Pośredni owal; Długi owal; Okrągły owal; Inne
vi: Độ vừa vặn của mũ bảo hiểm (hình dạng đầu): Oval trung bình; Oval dài; Oval tròn; Khác